Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-202
Volunteer firefighter; file certificate
of insurance.

No
Nebraska volunteer firefighter shall be dispatched on behalf of this state
pursuant to the compact set forth in section 35-201 outside the boundaries
of Nebraska unless such volunteer firefighter files with the Nebraska compact
administrator a valid certificate of insurance covering him or her for workers'
compensation benefits pursuant to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act outside
the boundaries of Nebraska.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 2.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.